Florida, session 2026, SB7002.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 119.0712, Florida 17 Statutes, is amended to read: 18 119.0712âExecutive branch agency-specific exemptions from 19 inspection or copying of public records.â 20 (4)âDEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS.âInformation held by the 21 Department of Military Affairs that is stored in a United States 22 Department of Defense system of records, transmitted using a 23 United States Department of Defense network or communications 24 device, or pertaining to the United States Department of 25 Defense, pursuant to 10 U.S.C. s. 394, is exempt from s. 26 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. Any 27 information not made exempt by this subsection may be disclosed 28 only after the department makes any redactions in accordance 29 with applicable federal and state laws. This exemption applies 30 to information made exempt by this subsection which is held by 31 the department before, on, or after the effective date of the 32 exemption. This subsection is subject to the Open Government 33 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 34 repealed on October 2, 2031 2026, unless reviewed and saved from 35 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 36 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.